Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 5.1. Virginia Fair Housing Law.
§ 36-96.3:2.
Reasonable accommodations; interactive process.

When a request for a reasonable accommodation establishes that such accommodation is necessary to afford a person with a disability, and who has a disability-related need, an equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling and does not impose either (i) an undue financial and administrative burden or (ii) a fundamental alteration to the nature of the operations of the person receiving the request, the request for the accommodation is reasonable and shall be granted.

When a person receives a request for accessible parking to accommodate a disability, the person receiving the request shall treat such request as a request for reasonable accommodation as provided by this chapter.

When a request for a reasonable accommodation may impose either (i) an undue financial and administrative burden or (ii) a fundamental alteration to the nature of the operations of the person receiving the request, the person receiving the request shall offer to engage in a good-faith interactive process to determine if there is an alternative accommodation that would effectively address the disability-related needs of the requester. An interactive process is not required when the requester does not have a disability and a disability-related need for the requested accommodation. As part of the interactive process, unless the reasonableness and necessity for the accommodation has been established by the requester, a request may be made for additional supporting documentation to evaluate the reasonableness of either the requested accommodation or any identified alternative accommodations. If an alternative accommodation is identified that effectively meets the requester’s disability-related needs and is reasonable, the person receiving the reasonable accommodation request shall make the effective alternative accommodation. However, the requester shall not be required to accept an alternative accommodation if the requested accommodation is also reasonable. The various factors to be considered for determining whether an accommodation imposes an undue financial and administrative burden include (a) the cost of the requested accommodation, including any substantial increase in the cost of the owner’s insurance policy; (b) the financial resources of the person receiving the request; (c) the benefits that the accommodation would provide to the person with a disability; and (d) the availability of alternative accommodations that would effectively meet the requester’s disability-related needs.

A request for a reasonable accommodation shall be determined on a case-by-case basis and may be denied if (i) the person on whose behalf the request for an accommodation was submitted is not disabled; (ii) there is no disability-related need for the accommodation; (iii) the accommodation imposes an undue financial and administrative burden on the person receiving the request; or (iv) the accommodation would fundamentally alter the nature of the operations of the person receiving the request. With respect to a request for reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling, the requested assistance animal shall (a) work, provide assistance, or perform tasks or services for the benefit of the requester or (b) provide emotional support that alleviates one or more of the identified symptoms or effects of such requester’s existing disability. In addition, as determined by the person receiving the request, the requested assistance animal shall not pose a clear and present threat of substantial harm to others or to the dwelling itself that is not solely based on breed, size, or type or cannot be reduced or eliminated by another reasonable accommodation.

History.

2017, cc. 575, 729; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 17.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 575 and 729, cl. 2 provides: “That if any provision of this act is determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development to be not substantially equivalent or otherwise inconsistent with the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq., as amended, such provision shall not be enforceable.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 17, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection B and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-101 Residential Lease Agreement, Etc.; No. 16-126 Simple Month-to-Month Lease; No. 16-221 Accessibility by Handicapped Persons; No. 16-295 Pets; No. 16-301 Application for Tenancy; No. 16-320 Checklist for Drafting Residential Lease.

§ 36-96.4.
Discrimination in residential real estate-related transactions; unlawful practices by lenders, insurers, appraisers, etc.; deposit of state funds in such institutions.

It is unlawful for any person or other entity, including any lending institution, whose business includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction, or in the manner of providing such a transaction, because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability. It is not unlawful, however, for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in residential real estate transactions to require any applicant to qualify financially for the loan or loans for which such person is making application.

As used in this section, the term “residential real estate-related transaction” means any of the following:

The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance (i) for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling or (ii) secured by residential real estate; or

The selling, brokering, insuring, or appraising of residential real property. However, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability.

It shall be unlawful for any state, county, city, or municipal treasurer or governmental official whose responsibility it is to account for, to invest, or manage public funds to deposit or cause to be deposited any public funds in any lending institution provided for herein which is found to be committing discriminatory practices, where such findings were upheld by any court of competent jurisdiction. Upon such a court’s judicial enforcement of any order to restrain a practice of such lending institution or for said institution to cease or desist in a discriminatory practice, the appropriate fiscal officer or treasurer of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof which has funds deposited in any lending institution which is practicing discrimination, as set forth herein, shall take immediate steps to have the said funds withdrawn and redeposited in another lending institution. If for reasons of sound economic management, this action will result in a financial loss to the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, the action may be deferred for a period not longer than one year. If the lending institution in question has corrected its discriminatory practices, any prohibition set forth in this section shall not apply.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-90; 1973, c. 358; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 2020, cc. 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the first sentence of subsection A and in the last sentence of subdivision B 2; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability” for “or handicap” in the first sentence of subsection A and the second sentence of subdivision B 2.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in subsection A and subdivision B 2.

§ 36-96.5.
Interference with enjoyment of rights of others under this chapter.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice for any person to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his having exercised or enjoyed, or on the account of his having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this chapter.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-93; 1973, c. 358; 1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.6.
Certain restrictive covenants void; instruments containing such covenants.

Any restrictive covenant and any related reversionary interest, purporting to restrict occupancy or ownership of property on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, elderliness, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military status, or disability, whether heretofore or hereafter included in an instrument affecting the title to real or leasehold property, are declared to be void and contrary to the public policy of the Commonwealth.

Any person who is asked to accept a document affecting title to real or leasehold property may decline to accept the same if it includes such a covenant or reversionary interest until the covenant or reversionary interest has been removed from the document. Refusal to accept delivery of an instrument for this reason shall not be deemed a breach of a contract to purchase, lease, mortgage, or otherwise deal with such property.

No person shall solicit or accept compensation of any kind for the release or removal of any covenant or reversionary interest described in subsection A. Any person violating this subsection shall be liable to any person injured thereby in an amount equal to the greater of three times the compensation solicited or received, or $500, plus reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred.

A family care home, foster home, or group home in which individuals with physical disabilities, mental illness, intellectual disability, or developmental disability reside, with one or more resident counselors or other staff persons, shall be considered for all purposes residential occupancy by a single family when construing any restrictive covenant which purports to restrict occupancy or ownership of real or leasehold property to members of a single family or to residential use or structure.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-91; 1973, c. 358; 1986, c. 574; 1989, c. 88; 1991, c. 557; 1998, c. 873; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2020, cc. 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478.

Cross references.

As to certificate of release of certain prohibited covenants, see §

55.1-300.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 873, cl. 2 provides: “That this act is declarative of existing law.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted “and any related reversionary interest,” substituted “are declared” for “is declared”; in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “or reversionary interest” in two places; added present subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals with physical handicaps, mental illness, intellectual disability, or developmental disability” for “physically handicapped, mentally ill, mentally retarded, or developmentally disabled persons” in subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in subsection A; and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability” for “or handicap” in subsection A; substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps” in subsection D; and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “The Mentally Retarded and Private Restrictive Covenants,” see 25 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 421 (1984).

§ 36-96.7.
Familial status protection not applicable to housing for older persons.

Nothing in this chapter regarding unlawful discrimination because of familial status shall apply to housing for older persons. As used in this section, “housing for older persons” means housing: (i) provided under any state or federal program that is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the state or federal program; or (ii) intended for, and solely occupied by, persons sixty-two years of age or older; or (iii) intended for, and solely occupied by, at least one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit. The following criteria shall be met in determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older persons under clause (iii) of this subsection:

At least eighty percent of the occupied units are occupied by at least one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and

The publication of, and adherence to, policies and procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons fifty-five years of age or older.

Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by reason of:

Persons residing in such housing as of September 13, 1988, who do not meet the age requirements of clauses (ii) and (iii) of subsection A, provided that new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of those clauses; or

Unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved for occupancy by persons who meet the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iii) of subsection A.

History.

1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 322; 2000, c. 30.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 30 substituted “clause (iii)” for “subdivision (iii)” at the end of the introductory language of subsection A; deleted former subdivision A 1, relating to the existence of significant facilities and services designed to meet the needs of older persons; redesignated former subdivision A 2 as present A 1, and in present subdivision A 1 deleted “That” from the beginning of the subdivision and substituted “occupied units” for “units”; redesignated former subdivision A 3 as present A 2; and in subdivisions B 1 and B 2 substituted “clauses” for “subdivisions” wherever it appears and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia property law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reserving vacancies that exist or become available in an established mobile home park solely for seniors

could be interpreted as discriminating against families with children, in violation of the state and federal fair housing laws; if, however, the park eventually reaches the eighty-percent senior occupancy rate requirement, and it does not otherwise violate the state and federal fair housing laws based on familial status, it may become eligible to operate and advertise as housing for seniors. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable R. Steven Landes, Member, House of Delegates, 02-098, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 160 (12/10/02).

§ 36-96.8.
Powers of Real Estate Board and Fair Housing Board.

The Real Estate Board and the Fair Housing Board, as provided in this chapter, have the power for the purposes of this chapter to initiate and receive complaints, conduct investigations of any violation of this chapter, attempt resolution of complaints by conference and conciliation, and, upon failure of such efforts, issue a charge and refer it to the Attorney General for action.

The Real Estate Board and the Fair Housing Board shall perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may promulgate and amend necessary regulations.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-94; 1973, c. 372; 1975, c. 566; 1984, c. 271; 1987, c. 167; 1991, c. 557; 2003, c. 575.

Cross references.

As to regulations implementing Acts 2003, c. 575, coordination between Real Estate Board and Fair Housing Board, and funding, see Editor’s note under §

36-96.1:1

.

As to general powers of Real Estate Board, see §

54.1-2105

.

As to provisions relating to the Fair Housing Board generally, see §

54.1-2343

et seq.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 575 inserted the subsection A designation; substituted “and the Fair Housing Board, as provided in this chapter, have” for “has” in subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 36-96.9.
Procedures for receipt or initiation of complaint; notice to parties; filing of answer.

A complaint under §

36-96.8

shall be filed with the Board in writing within one year after the alleged discriminatory housing practice occurred or terminated.

Any person not named in the complaint and who is identified as a respondent in the course of the investigation may be joined as an additional or substitute respondent upon written notice to such person by the Board explaining the basis for the Board’s belief that such person is properly joined as a respondent.

Any respondent may file an answer to a complaint. Complaints and answers must be made in writing, under oath or affirmation, and in such form as the Board requires. Complaints and answers may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time.

Upon the filing of a complaint or initiation of a complaint by the Board or its designee, the Board shall provide written notice to the parties as follows:

To the aggrieved person acknowledging the filing and advising such person of the time limits and choice of forums under this chapter; and

To the respondent, not later than ten days after such filing or the identification of an additional respondent under subsection B, identifying the alleged discriminatory housing practice and advising such respondent of the procedural rights and obligations of respondents under this chapter with a copy of the original complaint and copies of any supporting documentation referenced in the complaint.

History.

1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.10.
Procedures for investigation.

The Board shall commence proceedings with respect to a complaint within thirty days after receipt of the complaint, and shall complete the investigation within 100 days thereof unless it is impracticable to do so. If the Board is unable to complete the investigation within 100 days after the receipt of the complaint, the aggrieved person and the respondent shall be notified in writing of the reasons for not doing so.

When conducting an investigation of a complaint filed under this chapter, the Board shall have the right to interview any person who may have any information which may further its investigation and to request production of any records or documents for inspection and copying in the possession of any person which may further the investigation. Such persons shall be interviewed under oath. The Board or its designated subordinates shall have the power to issue and serve a subpoena to any such person to appear and testify and to produce any such records or documents for inspection and copying. Said subpoenas and discovery may be ordered to the same extent and subject to the same limitations as would apply if the subpoenas or discovery were ordered or served as part of a civil action in the Commonwealth of Virginia. In case of refusal or neglect to obey a subpoena, the Board may petition for its enforcement in the Circuit Court for the City of Richmond. The hearing on such petition shall be given priority on the court docket over all cases which are not otherwise given priority on the court docket by law.

At the end of each investigation under this section, the Board shall prepare a final investigative report containing:

The names and dates of contacts with witnesses;

A summary and the dates of correspondence and other contacts with the aggrieved person and the respondent;

A summary description of other pertinent records;

A summary of witness statements; and

Answers to interrogatories.A final report under this subsection may be amended if additional evidence is later discovered.

The Board shall make available to the aggrieved person and the respondent, at any time, upon request following completion of the Board’s investigation, information derived from an investigation and any final investigative report relating to that investigation.

History.

1975, c. 566, § 36-94.1; 1991, c. 557; 1998, c. 634.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “thirty days” for “30 days,” and in the second sentence, deleted “however, in no event shall the investigation extend beyond one year from the receipt of the complaint by the Board” following “reasons for not doing so.”

§ 36-96.11.
Reasonable cause determination and effect.

The Board shall, within 100 days after the filing of a complaint, determine, based on the facts and after consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, whether reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, unless it is impracticable to do so or unless the Board has approved a conciliation agreement with respect to the complaint. If the Board is unable to determine whether reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur within 100 days after receipt of the complaint, the aggrieved person and the respondent shall be notified in writing of the reasons therefor.

History.

1991, c. 557; 1998, c. 634.

The 1998 amendment

deleted the former second sentence which read: “In no event, however, shall the investigation be extended beyond one year from the receipt of the complaint by the Board” and added the present second sentence.

§ 36-96.12.
No reasonable cause determination and effect.

If the Board determines that no reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the Board shall promptly dismiss the complaint notifying the parties within thirty days of such determination.
The Board shall make public disclosure of each dismissal.

History.

1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.13.
Conciliation.

During the period beginning with the filing of such complaint and ending with the filing of a charge or a dismissal by the Board, the Board shall, to the extent feasible, engage in conciliation with respect to such complaint.

A conciliation agreement arising out of such conciliation shall be an agreement between the respondent and the complainant, and shall be subject to approval by the Board.

A conciliation agreement may provide for binding arbitration of the dispute arising from the complaint. Any such arbitration that results from a conciliation agreement may award appropriate relief, including monetary relief.

Each conciliation agreement shall be made public unless the complainant and respondent otherwise agree and the Board determines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of this chapter.

Whenever the Board has reasonable cause to believe that a respondent has breached a conciliation agreement, the Board may refer the matter to the Attorney General with a recommendation that a civil action be filed under §

36-96.17

for the enforcement of such agreement.

History.

1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 322.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Extra-Judicial Procedures. § 1.02 Joint Action of Both Parties. Bryson.

§ 36-96.14.
Issuance of a charge.

Upon failure to resolve a complaint by conciliation and after consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, the Board shall issue a charge on behalf of the aggrieved person or persons and shall immediately refer the charge to the Attorney General, who shall proceed with the charge as directed by §

36-96.16

.
The Board may not issue a charge under this section regarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice after the beginning of a trial of a civil action commenced by the aggrieved party under an Act of Congress or a state law seeking relief with respect to that discriminatory housing practice.

Such charge:

Shall consist of a short and plain statement of the facts upon which the Board has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur;

Shall be based on the final investigative report; and

Need not be limited to the acts or grounds alleged in the complaint filed under §

36-96.9

.

After the Board issues a charge under this section, the Board shall cause a copy thereof to be served on each respondent named in such charge and on each aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed.

History.

1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.15.
Prompt judicial action.

If the Board concludes at any time following the filing of a complaint and after consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the Board may authorize a civil action by the Attorney General for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief.
Upon receipt of such authorization, the Attorney General shall promptly commence and maintain such action. Any temporary restraining order or other order granting preliminary or temporary relief shall be issued in accordance with the Virginia Rules of Civil Procedure.
The commencement of a civil action under this section shall not affect the initiation or continuation of administrative proceedings by the Board under §

36-96.8

.

History.

1991, c. 557.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Injunctions, § 88.

§ 36-96.16.
Civil action by Attorney General upon referral of charge by the Real Estate Board.

Not later than thirty days after a charge is referred by the Board to the Attorney General under §

36-96.14

, the Attorney General shall commence and maintain a civil action seeking relief on behalf of the complainant in the circuit court for the city, county, or town in which the unlawful discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur.

Any aggrieved person with respect to the issues to be determined in a civil action pursuant to subsection A may intervene as of right.

In a civil action under this section, if the court or jury finds that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the court or jury may grant, as relief, any relief which a court could grant with respect to such discriminatory housing practice in a civil action under §

36-96.18

. Any relief so granted that would accrue to an aggrieved person under §

36-96.18

shall also accrue to the aggrieved person in a civil action under this section. If monetary relief is sought for the benefit of an aggrieved person who does not intervene in the civil action, the court shall not award such relief if that aggrieved person has not complied with discovery orders entered by the court in the course of the action brought under this section.

In any court proceeding arising under this section, the court, in its discretion, may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

History.

1991, c. 557; 1994, c. 814.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9. Counterclaims, Cross-Claims, and Third-Party Proceedings. § 9.04 Intervention. Friend.

§ 36-96.17.
Civil action by Attorney General; matters involving the legality of any local zoning or other land use ordinance; pattern or practice cases; or referral of conciliation agreement for enforcement.

If the Board determines, after consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, that an alleged discriminatory housing practice involves (i) the legality of any local zoning or land use ordinance or (ii) activity proscribed in subsection C of §

36-96.3

, instead of issuing a charge, the Board shall immediately refer the matter to the Attorney General for civil action in the appropriate circuit court for appropriate relief. A civil action under this subsection shall be commenced no later than the expiration of 18 months after the date of the occurrence or the termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the full enjoyment of any of the rights granted by this chapter, or that any group of persons has been denied any of the rights granted by this chapter and such denial raises an issue of general public importance, the Attorney General may commence a civil action in the appropriate circuit court for appropriate relief.

In the event of a breach of a conciliation agreement by a respondent, the Board may authorize a civil action by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may commence a civil action in any appropriate circuit court for appropriate relief. A civil action under this subsection shall be commenced no later than the expiration of 90 days after the referral of such alleged breach.

The Attorney General, on behalf of the Board, or other party at whose request a subpoena is issued, under this chapter, may enforce such subpoena in appropriate proceedings in the appropriate circuit court.

In a civil action under subsections A, B, and C, the court may:

Award such preventive relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the person responsible for a violation of this chapter as is necessary to assure the full enjoyment of the rights granted by this chapter.

Assess a civil penalty against the respondent (i) in an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation and (ii) in an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.

Award the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees and costs. The Commonwealth shall be liable for such fees and costs to the extent provided by the Code of Virginia.The court or jury may award such other relief to the aggrieved person, as the court deems appropriate, including compensatory damages, and punitive damages without limitation otherwise imposed by state law.

Upon timely application, any person may intervene in a civil action commenced by the Attorney General under subsection A, B, or C that involves an alleged discriminatory housing practice with respect to which such person is an aggrieved person or a party to a conciliation agreement. The court may grant such appropriate relief to any such intervening party as is authorized to be granted to a plaintiff in a civil action under §

36-96.18

.

History.

1991, c. 557; 1994, c. 814; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 267.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 267, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “(i)” and “or (ii) activity proscribed in subsection C of §

36-96.3

” and made stylistic changes.

§ 36-96.18.
Civil action; enforcement by private parties.

An aggrieved person may commence a civil action in an appropriate United States district court or state court not later than two years after the occurrence or the termination of an alleged discriminatory housing practice, or the breach of a conciliation agreement entered into under this chapter, whichever occurs last, to obtain appropriate relief with respect to such discriminatory housing practice or breach.

An aggrieved person may commence a civil action under §

36-96.18

A no later than 180 days after the conclusion of the administrative process with respect to a complaint or charge, or not later than two years after the occurrence or the termination of an alleged discriminatory housing practice, whichever is later. This subsection shall not apply to actions arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement. An aggrieved person may commence a civil action under this section whether or not a complaint has been filed under §

36-96.9

and without regard to the status of any such complaint. If the Board or a federal agency has obtained a conciliation agreement with the consent of an aggrieved person, no action may be filed under this section by such aggrieved person with respect to the alleged discriminatory housing practice which forms the basis for such complaint except for the purpose of enforcing the terms of such an agreement.

In a civil action under subsection A, if the court or jury finds that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the court or jury may award to the plaintiff, as the prevailing party, compensatory and punitive damages, without limitation otherwise imposed by state law, and the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and subject to subsection D, may grant as relief, any permanent or temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, including an order enjoining the defendant from engaging in such practice or order such affirmative action as may be appropriate.

Relief granted under subsection C shall not affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the granting of such relief and involving bona fide purchasers, encumbrancer or tenant, without actual notice of the filing of a complaint with the Board or civil action under this chapter.

Upon timely application, the Attorney General may intervene in such civil action, if the Attorney General certifies that the case is of general public importance. Upon intervention, the Attorney General may obtain such relief as would be available to the private party under subsection C.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-94; 1973, c. 372; 1975, c. 566; 1984, c. 271; 1987, c. 167; 1991, c. 557; 1994, c. 814.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 14 Costs. § 14.02 Items Not Included. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Costs, § 3; 20 M.J. Witnesses, § 2.

§ 36-96.19.
Witness fees.

Witnesses summoned by a subpoena under this chapter shall be entitled to the same witness and mileage fees as witnesses in proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth. Fees payable to a witness summoned by a subpoena issued at the request of a party shall be paid by that party or, where a party is unable to pay the fees, by the Board.

History.

1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.20.
Additional powers of the Real Estate Board; action on real estate licenses.

In any case in which the Board has received or initiated a complaint and conducted an investigation of any violation of this chapter and determined that there exists reasonable cause to believe that a real estate broker, real estate salesperson, real estate brokerage firm licensed in accordance with Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.), or their agents or employees have engaged in discriminatory housing practices prohibited by the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.) or Chapter 5 (§

6.2-500

et seq.) of Title 6.2, the Board shall immediately attempt to resolve the matter by conference and conciliation, and upon failure to resolve the matter in such manner, may initiate an administrative hearing to determine whether to revoke, suspend or fail to renew the license or licenses in question. Not less than 10 days prior to the initial conference hereunder, the Board shall prepare and deliver to the respondent or respondents a written report setting forth the scope, findings and conclusions of the investigation conducted under this section.

If any person operating under a real estate license issued by the Board, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, is found by a court to have violated any provision of this chapter and this fact is so certified to the Board, the Board, after notification to the licensee, shall take appropriate action to consider suspension or revocation of the license of the licensee.

History.

1972, c. 591, §§ 36-94, 36-95.2; 1973, c. 372; 1975, c. 566; 1984, c. 271; 1987, c. 167; 1991, c. 557; 1992, c. 84; 2003, c. 575; 2010, c. 794.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 575 in subsection A, substituted “real estate broker, real estate salesperson, real estate brokerage firm licensed in accordance with Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.), or their agents or employees have” for “licensed broker, salesperson, or agency has,” and substituted “10” for “ten;” and deleted subsection C, which read: “The Board shall perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may promulgate and amend necessary regulations.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 794, effective October 1, 2010, substituted “Chapter 5 (§

6.2-500

et seq.) of Title 6.2” for “the Virginia Equal Credit Opportunity Act (§ 59.1-21.19 et seq.)” in subsection A.

§ 36-96.21.
Powers of counties, cities and towns.

Any county, city or town which has any ordinance in effect on January 1, 1991, enacted under the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.), the Virginia Human Rights Act (§

2.2-3900

et seq.), or any other applicable state law may continue to enforce such ordinance and may amend the ordinance, provided the amendment is not inconsistent with this chapter. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit any county, city or town under this subsection from submitting amended ordinances to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development for substantial equivalency pursuant to Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. §§ 3604-3606), as amended.

The governing body of any county, city or town may enact ordinances in accordance with the provisions of this chapter provided that (i) such ordinances conform to this chapter and are enacted prior to September 30, 1992, and (ii) such amended ordinances are submitted to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development for a determination of substantial equivalency pursuant to Title VIII, Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. §§ 3604-3606), as amended.

History.

1972, c. 591, § 36-96; 1975, c. 345; 1982, c. 113; 1991, c. 557; 1996, cc. 173, 369.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “36-86” was changed to “36-96.1.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 173 and 369 are identical, and added the second sentence in subsection A, and, in subsection B, substituted “September 30, 1992” for “July 1, 1992” in clause (i) and deleted “prior to July 1, 1992” preceding “for a determination” in clause (ii).

§ 36-96.22.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-96.22

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1991, c. 557.

§ 36-96.23.
Construction of law.

Nothing in this chapter shall abridge the federal Fair Housing Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.) as amended.

History.

1991, c. 557.